Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,109
Public Entities Pooled Investment Act, how cited.

Sections 77-23,109 to 77-23,114 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Entities Pooled Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 31.